Utah statutes.
73-2-16.   Arbitration -- Confirmation by district court.

The state engineer is authorized to conduct informal proceedings for the arbitration or settlement of disputes over water or the distribution thereof; provided all persons having an interest in the water in controversy shall in writing agree to any settlement effected thereby, and provided further that settlements shall be confirmed by decree of a court of competent jurisdiction.



No Change Since 1953

